Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Registration.
Sec. 28.10.161.
Registration plates to be furnished by department.

Except for a vehicle registered under AS

28.10.152

, the department, upon registering a vehicle, shall issue the owner one fully reflectorized registration plate for a trailer or a motorcycle and two fully reflectorized registration plates for every other vehicle. Except as specifically provided in AS

28.10.181

, the plate or plates must remain with the vehicle as long as the vehicle is subject to registration under this chapter.

Every passenger vehicle registration plate, except as specifically provided in AS

28.10.181

, shall have displayed on it

one of the following designs:

the Alaska flag design, consisting of the Alaska flag, the traditional colors of yellow-gold and blue, and the slogan “The Last Frontier”;

the bear design, consisting of a standing grizzly bear in the center of the plate; the bear design shall be modeled after the 1976 bicentennial plate without the bicentennial symbol; or

the design celebrating the arts chosen by the commissioner through consultation with the Alaska State Council on the Arts; the commissioner shall choose a new design for the plates celebrating the arts every four years and discontinue issuance of the previous design;

the registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it is issued;

the name of this state, which may be abbreviated; and

the registration year number or expiration date for which time it is validated; the registration year number or expiration date may be part of the license plate or contained on a suitable sticker or tab device issued by the department; however, only one sticker or tab device may be issued for each pair of plates, and the sticker or tab device must be affixed to the rear plate.

The department may not adopt a new or altered passenger vehicle registration plate, except as specifically provided in AS

28.10.181

, unless it substantially embodies the specifications of this section.

The department shall produce registration plates in both of the designs described in (b)(1) of this section. Upon registering a passenger vehicle, the owner shall select the plate design described in (b)(1) of this section that is to be issued by the department for the vehicle.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 35 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 4 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 2, 3 ch 38 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 48 SLA 1998; am §§ 2, 3 ch 14 SLA 2007; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 98 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For a statement of purpose applicable to the amendment of (b) of this section by §§ 2 and 3, ch. 14, SLA 2007, to commemorate the 50th anniversary of the state’s admission to the United States, see § 1, ch. 14, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.
For a transitional provision authorizing continued use on or after May 29, 2007, of the remaining supply of the passenger vehicle registration plates described in (b) of this section before the subsection’s amendment by ch. 14, SLA 2007, see § 7, ch. 14, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.
For a transitional provision authorizing continued use on and after January 1, 2010, of the remaining supply of the passenger vehicle registration plates described in (b) of this section based on the subsection’s amendment by ch. 14, SLA 2007, see § 8, ch. 14, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.
For statement of intent concerning intervening amendments, see § 9, ch. 14, SLA 2007.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (b)(1), added “either” as the introductory language, in (b)(1)(A) inserted “design, consisting of the Alaska flag,”, added (b)(1)(B), and made related changes; in (c), inserted “, except as specifically provided in AS

28.10.181

,” following “vehicle registration plate”; added (d).

The 2018 amendment, effective October 27, 2018, rewrote the introductory language in (b)(1), which read “either”, added (b)(1)(C), and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 28.10.165.
Souvenir winter olympics plate. [Repealed, § 9 ch 20 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 28.10.170.
Expiration. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.171.
Display of registration plates.

When two registration plates are issued for a vehicle, they shall be attached to the vehicle for which issued, one in front and the other in the rear. When one registration plate is issued, it shall be attached to the rear of the vehicle for which issued.

Every registration plate issued under this chapter shall be securely fastened to the vehicle to which it is assigned, with the upper edge of the plate horizontal, at a height of not less than 12 inches from the ground measuring from the bottom of the plate, and maintained in a location and condition so as to be clearly legible. However, when considered necessary to insure legibility, the commissioner may provide by regulation for another method of installation.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Secs. 28.10.172,
28.10.180.
Staggered registration; renewal.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.181.
Registration of unique and special vehicles and vehicles used for special purposes; special registration plates.

The department shall register unique and special vehicles and vehicles used for special purposes and issue registration plates as provided in this section. Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, registration plates issued under this section remain with the person or organization to whom they are issued when vehicle ownership is transferred or title or interest in the vehicle is assigned, except for plates issued under (b), (h) and (i) of this section. Registration plates issued under this section may not be used on, or transferred to, a vehicle other than the vehicle for which the plates are issued without the approval of the department and payment of any required fees and taxes prescribed in AS

28.10.421(d)

,

28.10.431

, and

28.10.441

. Registration plates issued under this section to which a person is no longer entitled or the transfer of the plates to another vehicle that the department does not approve shall be returned immediately to the department by the person or organization to whom the plates were originally issued.

Historic vehicles. The owner of a historic vehicle may make application for special registration under this subsection. The department, when satisfied that the vehicle meets the requirements for historic vehicle registration under regulations adopted by the commissioner, shall register the vehicle and (1) issue two permanent registration plates of distinctive design and color bearing no date; vehicles qualifying for registration under this paragraph shall be issued registration plates numbered in a separate numerical series beginning with “Historic Vehicle No. 1”; or (2) allow the vehicle to use registration plates of this state supplied by the vehicle owner that correspond to the year the vehicle was manufactured if the vehicle was manufactured 30 or more years before the year of application. Registration plates issued under this subsection remain with the vehicle as long as the vehicle is registered under this subsection.

Special request plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department shall design and issue registration plates containing a series of not more than six letters or numbers or combination of letters and numbers as requested by the owner. The department may, in its discretion, disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested symbols are a duplication of an existing registration or when the symbols are considered unacceptable by the department.

Vehicles owned by veterans with disabilities, including persons disabled in the line of duty while serving in the Alaska Territorial Guard, or other persons with disabilities. Upon the request of a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, as defined in 23 C.F.R. 1235.2, the department shall (1) register one motor vehicle in the name of the person without charge; and (2) issue a specially designed registration plate that displays (A) recognition of the disabled veteran if the applicant’s disability originated from the applicant’s service with the Alaska Territorial Guard or the armed forces of the United States; (B) the international symbol of accessibility (the wheelchair logo); and (C) if the applicant is a veteran, the Alaska and United States flags and red, white, and blue colors. A person who is not otherwise qualified under this subsection, but who meets the qualifications of a disabled veteran under AS

29.45.030(i)

, may register one motor vehicle without charge, and the department shall issue a specially designed registration plate that displays recognition of the disabled veteran that does not display the international symbol of accessibility and does not carry with it special parking privileges. A disabled veteran who otherwise qualifies for a registration plate under this subsection may elect to receive a plate under (p) or (q) of this section for which the person is otherwise qualified that does not display the international symbol of accessibility and does not carry with it special parking privileges. A disabled person who otherwise qualifies for a registration plate under (2)(B) of this subsection may elect to receive a plate under another provision of this section for which the person is otherwise qualified that does not display the international symbol of accessibility and does not carry with it special parking privileges. For purposes of this subsection, proof of disability may be provided by a person licensed as a speech-language pathologist under AS 08.11, as a chiropractor under AS 08.20, as a physician or physician assistant under AS 08.64, as an advanced practice registered nurse under AS 08.68, or as a physical therapist or occupational therapist under AS 08.84.

Vehicles owned by the state, municipalities, and charitable organizations of the state. Every certificate of registration and registration plate issued to the state, a municipality, or charitable organization of the state is in effect until the vehicle for which the registration certificate and plate were issued is no longer owned and operated by the state, the municipality, or the charitable organization of the state or until the department, in its discretion, declares its expiration. The state, municipality, or charitable organization of the state shall maintain a current listing of all vehicles registered to it in the order of the registration number assigned to each vehicle, and shall provide a copy of the listing to the department upon request. The listing must include a description of each vehicle and other identifying information required by the department. Registration plates issued under this subsection must be of a distinctive design and numbering system. For the purposes of this subsection, “charitable organization” means a nonprofit association, corporation, society, or other entity organized, incorporated, or headquartered in the state for educational, cultural, scientific, or other charitable purposes, as prescribed in regulations of the department.

Vehicles owned by elected state officials. The department shall issue special registration plates to each incumbent elected state official for display on motor vehicles owned and driven by the official except that the plates may not be displayed on a vehicle that is visually identifiable as a commercial vehicle. The department shall number or design the plates so that registration by an elected state official is indicated upon the plates. The registration plates issued under this subsection may remain on the vehicle only during the official’s term of office.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 20 SLA 1990.]

Vehicles owned by ranchers, farmers, and dairymen. A vehicle not exceeding an unladen total gross weight of 20,000 pounds, owned by a person deriving the person’s primary source of livelihood from the operation of a ranch, farm, or dairy where the person resides full-time, and that is used exclusively to transport (1) the person’s own ranch, farm, or dairy products, or greenhouse or nursery products, including vegetables, plants, grass seed, sod, or tree seedlings, to and from the market, or (2) supplies, commodities, or equipment to be used on the person’s ranch, farm, or dairy, or in the person’s greenhouse or nursery, may be registered under this subsection and may be issued registration plates of a distinctive design or system of numbering.

Amateur mobile radio station vehicles. A validly licensed amateur radio operator who presents satisfactory proof that the owner holds an unexpired Federal Communications Commission amateur radio operator’s license of any renewable class, and who presents satisfactory proof that the vehicle contains or carries an amateur radio transmitter and receiving unit of a type applicable to the license class applied for, and who is permitted by law to operate a fixed station, may register one amateur mobile radio station vehicle for each radio license issued by the federal government and may receive for the vehicle distinctive registration plates instead of regular registration plates. The number on the plates must be the radio call sign of the owner.

Vehicles owned by dealers. A state-registered and bonded vehicle dealer may apply for dealer registration plates. A plate issued under this subsection may be used only on dealer-owned vehicles during the routine and normal course of the dealer’s business, excluding service vehicles, or for transporting an unregistered vehicle from a port of entry to the dealer’s facilities or from one dealer to another or, in the case of a house trailer, from the retail facility to a trailer space. A vehicle permitted to have dealer plates must be affixed with two plates issued under this subsection. If the dealer sells or transfers the vehicle, the dealer plates may be used on the vehicle by the new owner or transferee for a period of not more than five days after the sale or transfer. The department may seize the dealer plates if it has reason to believe that the plates are being used to defeat the purposes of, or are in violation of, this chapter.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 8 SLA 1993.]

Vehicles owned by Pearl Harbor survivors, former prisoners of war, Medal of Honor recipients, and relatives of members of the United States armed forces killed in the line of duty. The department, upon receipt of written proof, shall issue without charge special registration plates for one noncommercial motor vehicle to a person who was on active military duty in Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, who has been a prisoner of war during a declared war or other conflict, as determined by the Department of Defense under federal regulations, who is the recipient of the Medal of Honor awarded by the President of the United States in the name of the United States Congress, or the spouse, parent, guardian, brother, sister, or dependent of a member of the United States armed forces killed in the line of duty. The design and color of the Pearl Harbor survivor, prisoner of war, Medal of Honor awarded by the President of the United States in the name of the United States Congress recipient, or relative of a member of the United States armed forces killed in the line of duty plates shall be solely within the discretion of the commissioner.

Special request plates for Alaska National Guard personnel. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle who presents satisfactory proof of current membership in the Alaska National Guard, the department may design and issue registration plates that identify the vehicle as registered to a member of the Alaska National Guard.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 20 SLA 1990.]

Special request university plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may design and issue registration plates representing the University of Alaska Anchorage, University of Alaska Fairbanks, University of Alaska Southeast, or Prince William Sound Community College. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

Vehicles owned by veterans. The department, upon receipt of written proof that the veteran is a sole or joint owner of a motor vehicle, shall issue special registration plates for the motor vehicle to a requesting person who is a veteran or retired veteran of the armed forces of the United States. The commissioner, after consulting with the person in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs in charge of veterans’ affairs, shall determine the design and color of the veteran or retired veteran plates.

Vehicles owned by recipients of the Purple Heart. The department, upon receipt of written proof that the person is the sole or joint owner of a motor vehicle, shall issue special registration plates for the motor vehicle to a requesting person who has received the Purple Heart medal awarded for wounds suffered in action against an armed enemy or as a result of the hostile action of an armed enemy. The commissioner, after consulting with the person in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs in charge of veterans’ affairs, shall determine the design and color of the Purple Heart medal recipient plates.

Special request custom collector plates. Upon application by the owner of a custom collector vehicle, the department may design and issue registration plates appropriate for custom collector vehicles. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

Special request dog mushing plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may design and issue registration plates representing the sport of dog mushing in the state. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

Special request Alaska children’s trust plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may design and issue registration plates representing the Alaska children’s trust under AS

37.14.200

. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 70 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 11 SLA 2002.]

Special request plates commemorating Alaska veterans. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates commemorating Alaska veterans. The commissioner shall determine the design and color of plates commemorating Alaska veterans. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

Special request plates commemorating and supporting troops. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates commemorating and supporting troops. The commissioner, in consultation with Support Our Troops, Inc., shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration “Support Our Troops” shall appear at the bottom of the plate and may be alternated with “Support Our Heroes” if Support Our Troops, Inc., approves the use of terms and agrees to be responsible for any costs incurred from lack of sale of plates.

Special request Iditarod race finisher plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may design and issue Iditarod race finisher registration plates to a person who has finished the Iditarod race. The owner shall supply written proof, verified by the Iditarod Trail Committee, that the owner has successfully finished the race. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

Special request firefighter and emergency medical service provider plates. On application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates for firefighters and emergency medical service providers. The commissioner shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration. To be eligible for a firefighter and emergency medical service provider plate, a person shall present satisfactory proof that the person is

an active member of

a fire department in this state and the fire department is recognized as a fire department by the state fire marshal; or

an out-of-hospital emergency medical service certified by the Department of Health and Social Services; or

a former firefighter or emergency medical service provider who was an active member of

a fire department in this state for a minimum of five years; or

an out-of-hospital emergency medical service certified by the Department of Health and Social Services for a minimum of five years.

(aa)

Special request fraternal organization member plates. On the request of a fraternal organization, the department may design a registration plate for the members of that fraternal organization. On application by the owner of a motor vehicle who is a member of that fraternal organization, the department may issue the fraternal organization registration plates to the person. The commissioner shall determine the design and color of the fraternal organization plates in consultation with the fraternal organization. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration. To be eligible for a fraternal organization member registration plate, a person must present evidence satisfactory to the department of the person’s membership in the fraternal organization. In this subsection, “fraternal organization” means a civic, service, or charitable organization in the state, except a college and high school fraternity, not for pecuniary profit, that is a branch, lodge, or chapter of a national organization and exists for the common business, brotherhood, or other interest of its members.

(bb)

Special request United States flag “In God We Trust” plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates with a design incorporating the flag of the United States and the motto “In God We Trust” on the plate. The commissioner shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

(cc)

Special request Lao veteran plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates commemorating the owner’s service in military operations in support of the United States in the Kingdom of Laos between February 28, 1961, and May 15, 1975. The commissioner shall determine the design and color of the Lao veteran plates in consultation with veterans’ and Southeast Asian community organizations in the state. To be issued a registration plate under this subsection, the owner must present evidence satisfactory to the department that the owner served in military operations as required by this subsection. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplicate of an existing registration.

(dd)

Special request plates commemorating the National Rifle Association. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates commemorating the National Rifle Association. The commissioner, after consulting with representatives of the National Rifle Association in Alaska, shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

(ee)

Special request breast cancer awareness plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue breast cancer awareness registration plates. The commissioner, after consulting with the Alaska office of the American Cancer Society, shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

(ff)

Special request “Choose Life” plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates with the phrase “Choose Life” on the plate. The commissioner, after consulting with Alaska Choose Life, shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

(gg)

Special request “Pro-Family, Pro-Choice” plates. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates with the phrase “Pro-Family, Pro-Choice” on the plate. The commissioner, after consulting with Planned Parenthood of the Great Northwest, shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

(hh)

Experimental vehicles. A vehicle manufacturer or distributor may apply for experimental vehicle plates. A plate issued under this subsection may be used only on an experimental vehicle present in the state. The vehicle manufacturer shall certify to the department that, at the conclusion of the testing, the experimental vehicle was destroyed or removed from the state. Experimental vehicle plates issued under this subsection are valid for a 12-month period and may be renewed for additional 12-month periods, up to a maximum of 36 months, until the testing is complete. Notwithstanding
AS

28.10.201

, an experimental vehicle may not be titled under this chapter. In this subsection, “experimental vehicle” means a vehicle in the developmental stage that has not yet reached production in the United States.

(ii)

Special request plates commemorating the Blood Bank of Alaska. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates commemorating the Blood Bank of Alaska. The commissioner, after consulting with representatives of the Blood Bank of Alaska, shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration.

(jj)

Vehicles owned by recipients of the Bronze Star awarded for valor, Silver Star, Navy Cross, Distinguished Service Cross, Air Force Cross, or Coast Guard Cross. The department, upon receipt of written proof that the person is the sole or joint owner of a motor vehicle, shall issue special registration plates for the motor vehicle to a requesting person who has received the Bronze Star Medal awarded for valor, Silver Star Medal, Navy Cross, Distinguished Service Cross, Air Force Cross, or Coast Guard Cross. The commissioner, after consulting with the person in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs in charge of veterans’ affairs, shall determine the design and color of the Bronze Star awarded for valor recipient plates, Silver Star recipient plates, Navy Cross recipient plates, Distinguished Service Cross recipient plates, Air Force Cross recipient plates, and Coast Guard Cross recipient plates.

(kk)

Vehicles owned by recipients of awards reflecting valor issued by the armed forces of the United States. The department, upon written proof that the person is the sole or joint owner of a motor vehicle, may issue special registration plates for the motor vehicle to a requesting person who has received an award reflecting valor issued by the armed forces of the United States other than a Purple Heart, Bronze Star awarded for valor, Silver Star, Navy Cross, Distinguished Service Cross, Air Force Cross, or Coast Guard Cross. The commissioner, after consulting with the person in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs in charge of veterans’ affairs, shall determine the design and color of the award recipient plates.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 60 SLA 1986; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 24 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1989; am § 9 ch 20 SLA 1990; am §§ 12, 13 ch 93 SLA 1991; am §§ 1, 2 ch 16 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 8 SLA 1993; am §§ 55, 56, 79 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1998; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 88 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1999; am §§ 1, 2 ch 44 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 4 ch 11 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 18 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 2003; am §§ 1 — 12 ch 96 SLA 2005; am §§ 20, 21 ch 12 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2007; am § 4 ch 14 SLA 2007; am §§ 2, 3 ch 46 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 116 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 2013; am § 4 ch 98 SLA 2014; am §§ 1, 2 ch 15 SLA 2016; am § 44 ch 33 SLA 2016; am §§ 3, 4, 8am § 3 ch 70 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (p) and (q) were enacted as (o) and (p), respectively.
Renumbered in 1989. Subsection (u) was enacted as subsection (t). Relettered in 1998.

In 2016, in the title of subsection (u) "celebrating" was substituted for "commemorating" to correct a manifest error.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to a design competition for arts special request plates under subsection (u), see AS

44.27.080

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 23, 2009, added subsection (y).

The 2010 amendment, effective July 2, 2010, added (z) and (aa).

The 2012 amendment, effective March 8, 2012, added (bb) through (gg).

The 2013 amendment, effective August 27, 2013, added (hh).

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote (z), which read, “Special request active firefighter and emergency medical service provider plates and former firefighter and emergency medical service provider plates. On application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the department may issue registration plates for active firefighters and emergency medical service providers and registration plates for former firefighters and emergency medical service providers. The commissioner shall determine the design and color of the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration. To be eligible for (1) an active firefighter and emergency medical service provider plate, a person must present satisfactory proof that the person is an active member of (A) a fire department in this state and the fire department is recognized as a fire department by the state fire marshal; or (B) an out-of-hospital emergency medical service certified by the Department of Health and Social Services; (2) a former firefighter and emergency medical service provider plate, a person must present satisfactory proof that the person was an active member of (A) a fire department in this state for a minimum of 10 years; or (B) an out-of-hospital emergency medical service certified by the Department of Health and Social Services for a minimum of 10 years.”

The first 2016 amendment, effective August 31, 2016, in (u), substituted “celebrating” for “commemorating” in two places, added the third sentence; added (ii).

The second 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (d), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”.

The 2018 amendment, effective October 27, 2018, in (d), in the last sentence, inserted “chiropractor under AS 08.20, as a” following “person licensed as a”; repealed (u); effective January 1, 2019, added (jj) and (kk).

The 2021 amendment, effective November 23, 2021, in (d), in the last sentence, inserted “as a speech-language pathologist under AS 08.11,” following “by a person licensed” and “, or as a physical therapist or occupational therapist under AS 08.84” following “under AS 08.68” and made a related change.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, §§ 59, 84 to 97-92.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 171 et seq.

Secs. 28.10.190,
28.10.200.
Transfer of special plates; annual tax. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]